Wyoming, session 2025, HB0030.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 31-7-105(e), 31-7-113(a) by creating
a new paragraph (xiii), 31-7-115(b), 31-7-118 and
31-8-102(a)(vii) are amended to read:
31-7-105. Administrative hearings.
(e) The licensee has twenty (20) days from the date
the department denies the license or gives the notice of
intent to suspend, revoke or cancel the license or
disqualify the licensee from driving a commercial motor
vehicle within which to request a hearing or the
opportunity for a hearing is waived. If the request for a
hearing is timely and the request is for a contested case,
the department shall forward the request and certified
record to the hearing examiner who shall schedule a hearing
within forty-five (45) days after receipt of the certified
record at a time and place specified by the hearing
examiner. The hearing examiner shall provide the licensee
notice of the hearing at least ten (10) days in advance of
the hearing. If the hearing examiner fails to schedule the
hearing within forty-five (45) days of receipt of the
request certified record from the department, other than at
the request of the licensee, the licensee, as his sole
remedy, shall be given credit against any action upheld at
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0030
ENROLLED ACT NO. 6, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
the hearing for the time between the expiration of the
forty-five (45) day period and the date the hearing was
first scheduled. The hearing examiner may administer oaths,
subpoena and compel the attendance of witnesses or the
production of relevant books, papers and other evidence
reasonably necessary to resolve the matters under
consideration in accordance with W.S. 16-3-101 through
16-3-115 and may require reexamination of the licensee. The
hearing examiner shall issue subpoenas upon his own motion
or upon the request of any party to the proceedings in
compliance with the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure. Upon
hearing, the hearing examiner shall either rescind or
uphold the action or upon a showing of good cause, may
continue or modify a suspension of the license.
31-7-113. Fees.
(a) The following fees are imposed, in addition to
the fee in subsection (g) of this section:
(xiii) Replacement license under W.S. 31-7-118 .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 20.00
31-7-115. Issuance, description and contents.
(b) Licenses issued to persons under twenty-one (21)
years of age shall bear distinctive markings indicating the
licensee is under twenty-one (21) years. After January 1,
1994, a license and shall expire no later than when the
licensee attains twenty-one (21) years of age. The
department shall notify the licensee at least ninety (90)
days prior to his twenty-first birthday of the expiration
date of his license. A licensee may apply for a license
within ninety (90) days of attaining the age of twenty-one
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0030
ENROLLED ACT NO. 6, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(21) years, payment of the proper fee and surrender of the
original license in accordance with W.S. 31-7-119(a).
31-7-118. Replacement license.
(a) If a license issued under this act is lost,
destroyed or if the licensee desires to withdraw or insert
notice of anatomical organ donation or a medical alert
designation, the person may obtain the appropriate
replacement license upon payment of the proper fee and
surrender of the original license, if available.
(b) The department may issue a replacement license
under this section without the examinations required under
W.S. 31-7-114, except for a commercial driver's license
with a hazardous materials endorsement, upon request by the
licensee either by mail or in person if the following
conditions exist:
(i) The expiration date of the licensee's
original license is more than one (1) year from the date of
the licensee's request for a replacement license;
(ii) The licensee has not legally changed the
licensee's name since issuance of the licensee's original
license; and
(iii) The department has a digitized photograph
and signature of the licensee on record.
(c) A replacement license issued under this section
shall expire on the expiration date of the licensee's
original license.
31-8-102. Contents.
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0030
ENROLLED ACT NO. 6, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(a) The identification card or digital identification
card shall resemble a Wyoming driver's license or digital
driver's license. It shall have:
(vii) The following: "State of
Wyoming"-"Identification Card No. ...."-"This card is
provided solely for the purpose of identification of the
person described on the card FOR IDENTIFICATION PURPOSES
ONLY";
Section 2. W.S. 31-7-113(a)(iv) and 31-7-119(e) are
repealed.
Section 3. The department of transportation shall
promulgate rules as necessary to implement this act.
4

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0030
ENROLLED ACT NO. 6, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 4.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective January 1, 2026.
(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
5